North Carolina, session 2025, HB392.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Office of State Budget and Management
the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The United Way of Forsyth County, Inc., a
nonprofit organization, to fund summer learning programs through various community agencies.
The United Way shall develop and issue a Request for Proposal (RFP) to contract with
community agencies that will be supporting summer learning programs, either as an extension of
services already offered or through vetted organizations that desire to offer summer learning
opportunities for students that will not be eligible for summer learning programs through the
local school system.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H392-v-1*